Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska44-3,141
Motor vehicle theft or fraud; release of relevant information; immunity.

Any insurer, any person acting on behalf of the insurer, an authorized agency, or any of their respective employees, who releases relevant information under sections 44-3,134 to 44-3,142 with reasonable cause to believe the truth of such information, shall be immune from any civil or criminal liability for releasing such information.

Laws 1987, LB 78, § 8.